Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB12.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.7991 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Covered person" means a:
1. Judicial officer or an immediate family member of a judicial officer; or
2. Current member of the General Assembly or his or her immediate
family member;
(b) "Disclose" means to post, display, publish, or otherwise make publicly
available;
(c) "Immediate family member" means:
1. A spouse, child, parent, or person under the familial custody or care of a
covered person[judicial officer]; or
2. Any other familial relative who resides in the same household as the
covered person[judicial officer];
(d) "Judicial officer" means any active or senior judge and includes a:
1. Justice of the United States or a judge of the United States as those
terms are defined in 28 U.S.C. sec. 451;
2. Bankruptcy judge appointed under 28 U.S.C. sec. 152 or recalled
pursuant to 28 U.S.C. sec. 375;
3. United States magistrate judge appointed under 28 U.S.C. sec. 631 or
recalled pursuant to 28 U.S.C. sec. 375;
4. Judge confirmed by the United States Senate and empowered by statute
in any commonwealth, territory, or possession to perform the duties of a
federal judge;
5. Judge of the United States Court of Federal Claims appointed under 28
U.S.C. sec. 171; and
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 11/17/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 164
6. Justice, judge, trial commissioner, or domestic relations commissioner
of the Kentucky Court of Justice;
(e) "Personally identifiable information" means data that can identify a covered
person and includes:
1. Date of birth;
2. Biometric, health, or medical data, or insurance information;
3. Residence addresses of the covered person;
4. Home or cellular telephone numbers;
5. Personal email addresses;
6. Identities of the children of a covered person[judicial officer] and names
and locations of schools and daycare facilities they attend;
7. Social Security number; and
8. The name of an immediate family member's employer; and
(f) "Written request" means a notice signed by a covered person requesting a
government agency refrain from posting or displaying publicly available
content that includes the personally identifiable information of the covered
person.
(2) (a) A government agency shall not disclose the personally identifiable
information of any covered person if the covered person has made a written
request to the government agency that this personally identifiable information
not be disclosed.
(b) Upon receipt of the written request, personally identifiable information shall
be removed from publicly available content within seventy-two (72) hours.
(c) A request under this subsection may be made on behalf of a minor who is a
covered person by a parent or guardian of the minor.
(3) (a) After the government agency has removed the personally identifiable
information from publicly available content, the government agency shall not
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/17/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 164
publicly post or otherwise release the information.
(b) Publication of personally identifiable information by the covered person
removes any prohibition under paragraph (a) of this subsection[unless the
covered person voluntarily publishes the information on the internet after June
27, 2025].
(4) A covered person may bring a civil action seeking injunctive or declaratory relief to
enforce this section in any court of competent jurisdiction.
(5) This section shall not apply to any disclosure required under KRS Chapter 6 or
61.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/17/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed